Maryland, session 2025, HB0275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
12–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Actual income” means income from any source.
(2) For income from self–employment, rent, royalties, proprietorship of a
business, or joint ownership of a partnership or closely held corporation, “actual income”
means gross receipts minus ordinary and necessary expenses required to produce income.
(3) “Actual income” includes:
(i) salaries;
– 1 –

Ch. 532 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) wages;
(iii) commissions;
(iv) bonuses;
(v) dividend income;
(vi) pension income;
(vii) interest income;
(viii) trust income;
(ix) annuity income;
(x) Social Security benefits;
(xi) workers’ compensation benefits;
(xii) unemployment insurance benefits;
(xiii) disability insurance benefits;
(xiv) for the obligor, any third party payment paid to or for a minor
child as a result of the obligor’s disability, retirement, or other compensable claim;
(xv) alimony or maintenance received; and
(xvi) expense reimbursements or in–kind payments received by a
parent in the course of employment, self–employment, or operation of a business to the
extent the reimbursements or payments reduce the parent’s personal living expenses.
(4) Based on the circumstances of the case, the court may consider the
following items as actual income:
(i) severance pay;
(ii) capital gains;
(iii) gifts; or
(iv) prizes.
(5) “Actual income” does not include benefits received from
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 532
means–tested public assistance programs, including temporary cash assistance,
Supplemental Security Income, food stamps, and transitional emergency, medical, and
housing assistance.
(c) (1) “Adjusted actual income” means actual income minus:
[(1)] (I) preexisting reasonable child support obligations actually paid;
[and]
[(2)] (II) except as provided in § 12–204(a)(2) of this subtitle, alimony or
maintenance obligations actually paid; AND
(III) AN ALLOWANCE FOR SUPPORT FOR EACH CHILD LIVING IN
A PARENT’S HOME TO WHOM THE PARENT OWES A LEGAL DUTY OF SUPPORT IF THE
CHILD IS CONSIDERED TO BE SPENDING MORE THAN 92 OVERNIGHTS IN THE
PARENT’S HOME IN A YEAR AND NOT SUBJECT TO THE SUPPORT ORDER.
(2) FOR PURPOSES OF DETERMINING THE AMOUNT OF THE
ALLOWANCE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) THE BASIC CHILD SUPPORT OBLIGATION FOR EACH
ADDITIONAL CHILD IN THE PARENT’S HOME SHALL BE DETERMINED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 12–204 OF THIS SUBTITLE, USING ONLY THE ACTUAL INCOME
OF THE PARENT ENTITLED TO THE DEDUCTION; AND
(II) THE AMOUNT DETERMINED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE MULTIPLIED BY 75%.
(3) THE COURT SHALL DECLINE TO AWARD AN ALLOWANCE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF THE COURT FINDS, AFTER CONSIDERING
THE EVIDENCE AND THE BEST INTEREST OF THE CHILD FOR WHOM SUPPORT IS
BEING DETERMINED, THAT THE APPLICATION OF AN ALLOWANCE WOULD BE
UNJUST OR INAPPROPRIATE.
12–202.
(a) (1) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection and
subsection (b) of this section, in any proceeding to establish or modify child support,
whether pendente lite or permanent, the court shall use the child support guidelines set
forth in this subtitle.
(2) (i) There is a rebuttable presumption that the amount of child
support which would result from the application of the child support guidelines set forth in
this subtitle is the correct amount of child support to be awarded.
– 3 –

Ch. 532 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) The presumption may be rebutted by evidence that the
application of the guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case.
(iii) In determining whether the application of the guidelines would
be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case, the court may consider ANY FINANCIAL
CONSIDERATIONS:
1. [the terms of any] SPECIFIED IN AN existing separation
or property settlement agreement or court order, including:
A. any provisions for payment of mortgages [or], marital
debts, [payment of] OR college education expenses[,];
B. the terms of any use and possession order or right to
occupy the family home under an agreement[,]; AND
C. any direct payments made for the benefit of the children
required by THE agreement or order[, or any other financial considerations set out in an
existing separation or property settlement agreement or court order];
2. [the presence in the household of either parent of other
children to whom that parent owes a duty of support and the expenses for whom that parent
is directly contributing; and] THAT THE COURT DEEMS RELEVANT TO THE BEST
INTERESTS OF THE CHILD WHO IS THE SUBJECT OF THE CHILD SUPPORT ORDER; OR
3. [whether an obligor’s monthly child support obligation]
THAT would leave the obligor with a monthly actual income below 110% of the 2019 federal
poverty level for an individual.
(iv) [The presumption may not be rebutted solely on the basis of
evidence of the presence in the household of either parent of other children to whom that
parent owes a duty of support and the expenses for whom that parent is directly
contributing.
(v)] 1. If the court determines that the application of the
guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case, the court shall make a
written finding or specific finding on the record stating the reasons for departing from the
guidelines.
2. The court’s finding shall state:
A. the amount of child support that would have been required
under the guidelines;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 532
B. how the order varies from the guidelines;
C. how the finding serves the best interests of the child WHO
IS THE SUBJECT OF THE ORDER; and
D. in cases in which items of value are conveyed instead of a
portion of the support presumed under the guidelines, the estimated value of the items
conveyed.
12–204.
(a) (1) The basic child support obligation shall be determined in accordance
with the schedule of basic child support obligations in subsection (e) of this section. The
basic child support obligation shall be divided between the parents in proportion to their
adjusted actual incomes.
(2) (i) If one or both parents have made a request for alimony or
maintenance in the proceeding in which a child support award is sought, the court shall
decide the issue and amount of alimony or maintenance before determining the child
support obligation under these guidelines.
(ii) If the court awards alimony or maintenance, the amount of
alimony or maintenance awarded shall be considered actual income for the recipient of the
alimony or maintenance and shall be subtracted from the income of the payor of the alimony
or maintenance under [§ 12–201(c)(2)] § 12–201(C)(1)(II) of this subtitle before the court
determines the amount of a child support award.
(3) THE AMOUNT OF THE ALLOWANCE FOR THE SUPPORT OF
ADDITIONAL CHILDREN LIVING IN A PARENT’S HOME DESCRIBED IN §
12–201(C)(1)(III) OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE SUBTRACTED FROM THE PARENT’S
ACTUAL INCOME BEFORE THE COURT DETERMINES THE AMOUNT OF A CHILD
SUPPORT AWARD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 5 –